Hawaii statutes.
§181-10 Funds. All fees and fines
collected under this chapter and all moneys forfeited under any bond or deposit
shall be paid into the treasury of the State as general realizations. [L 1957,
c 161, §11; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §21; am L 1961, c 132, §2; Supp, §98C-11; HRS
§181-10; am L 1993, c 280, §50]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next